ro-RO: Caracteristici ale organizatorului de ațe: Separatoare reglabile; Mâner pentru transport; Capac transparent/fereastră; Sertar(e); Bucle elastice; Buzunare exterioare; Cârlig pentru agățare; Zonă pentru etichetă; Încuietoare de blocare; Curea portabilă; Tavă detașabilă; Tije/Pini pentru mosoare; Stivuibil; Bază pivotantă/rotativă; Inel pentru ghidarea firului/aței; Buzunar pentru accesorii cu fermoar; Altele
sl-SI: Lastnosti organizatorja za sukance in prejo: Prilagodljive pregrade; Ročaj za nošenje; Prozoren pokrov/okno; Predali; Elastične zanke; Zunanji žepi; Kljuka za obešanje; Mesto za etiketo; Zaklep; Trak za nošenje; Odstranljiv pladenj; Zatiči/klini za tuljave; Zložljivo eno na drugo; Vrtljivo podnožje; Odprtina za podajanje niti/preje; Žep za dodatke z zadrgo; Drugo
hu: szál & fonalszervező jellemzői: Állítható elválasztók; Hordozófül; Átlátszó fedél/ablak; Fiók(ok); Rugalmas hurkok; Külső zsebek; Akasztó; Címkézhető rész; Zárható retesz; Hordozópánt; Kivehető tálca; Spulnitartó tüskék/csapok; Egymásra rakható; Forgótalp; Szál-/fonalvezető nyílás; Cipzáras tartozékzseb; Egyéb
lt-LT: Siūlų ir verpalų laikiklio ypatybės: Reguliuojami skirtukai; Nešiojimo rankena; Skaidrus dangtis / langelis; Stalčius (-iai); Elastinės kilpos; Išorinės kišenės; Kabinimo kablys; Vieta etiketei; Užrakinamas fiksatorius; Nešiojimo dirželis; Išimamas padėklas; Kaiščiai ritėms; Sudedami vienas ant kito; Sukiojamas / besisukantis pagrindas; Siūlų / verpalų padavimo skylutė; Užsegama kišenė priedams; Kita
vi: Đặc điểm của hộp đựng chỉ và sợi: Vách ngăn điều chỉnh được; Tay cầm mang đi; Nắp/cửa sổ trong suốt; Ngăn kéo; Vòng thun; Túi bên ngoài; Móc treo; Khu vực dán nhãn; Chốt khóa; Dây đeo mang đi; Khay tháo rời được; Trục/chốt gắn ống chỉ; Có thể xếp chồng; Đế xoay; Lỗ luồn chỉ/sợi; Túi phụ kiện có khóa kéo; Khác
el: Χαρακτηριστικά του οργανωτή για νήματα και κλωστές: Ρυθμιζόμενα διαχωριστικά; Λαβή μεταφοράς; Διαφανές καπάκι/παράθυρο; Συρτάρι(α); Ελαστικές θηλιές; Εξωτερικές τσέπες; Γάντζος ανάρτησης; Περιοχή ετικέτας; Κλείστρο ασφάλισης; Φορητός ιμάντας; Αφαιρούμενος δίσκος; Πείροι/άξονες καρουλιών; Στοιβαζόμενο; Περιστρεφόμενη βάση; Οπή τροφοδοσίας κλωστής/νήματος; Τσέπη αξεσουάρ με φερμουάρ; Άλλο
es: Características del organizador de hilo y lana: Divisores ajustables; Asa de transporte; Tapa/ventana transparente; Cajón(es); Bucles elásticos; Bolsillos externos; Gancho para colgar; Área de etiquetas; Pestillo de bloqueo; Correa portátil; Bandeja extraíble; Pasadores/clavijas de carrete; Apilable; Base giratoria/pivotante; Ojal de alimentación de hilo/lana; Bolsillo para accesorios con cremallera; Otro
en: Thread & yarn organizer features: Adjustable dividers; Carrying handle; Clear lid/window; Drawer(s); Elastic loops; External pockets; Hanging hook; Label area; Locking latch; Portable strap; Removable tray; Spool pins/pegs; Stackable; Swivel/rotating base; Thread/yarn feed grommet; Zippered accessory pocket; Other
ko: 실 및 원사 정리함 기능: 조절형 칸막이; 운반용 손잡이; 투명 덮개/창; 서랍; 탄성 고리; 외부 주머니; 걸이용 후크; 레이블 영역; 잠금 래치; 휴대용 스트랩; 분리형 트레이; 스풀 핀/페그; 적층 가능; 스위블/회전 받침대; 실/털실 공급 그로밋; 지퍼형 액세서리 주머니; 기타
nb: Funksjoner for tråd- og garnorganisering: Justerbare inndelere; Bærehåndtak; Gjennomsiktig lokk/vindu; Skuff(er); Elastiske løkker; Utvendige lommer; Opphengskrok; Etikettområde; Låseklemme; Bærestropp; Avtakbart brett; Spolepinner/knagger; Kan stables; Svingbar/roterende base; Gjennomføringsmalje for tråd/garn; Tilbehørslomme med glidelås; Annet
th: คุณสมบัติของผู้จัดเส้นด้ายและเส้นด้าย: แผงกั้นแบบปรับได้; หูหิ้ว; ฝาปิด/หน้าต่างแบบใส; ลิ้นชัก; ช่องยางยืด; กระเป๋าด้านนอก; ตะขอแขวน; พื้นที่สำหรับติดป้าย; สลักล็อก; สายสะพายพกพา; ถาดถอดได้; แกน/หมุดเสียบหลอดด้าย; วางซ้อนได้; ฐานหมุน/สวิงได้; ช่องตาไก่ร้อยด้าย/ไหมพรม; กระเป๋าใส่อุปกรณ์แบบมีซิป; อื่นๆ
fr: Caractéristiques de l’organisateur de fils: Séparateurs réglables; Poignée de transport; Couvercle/fenêtre transparente; Tiroir(s); Boucles élastiques; Poches externes; Crochet de suspension; Zone d'étiquetage; Loquet de verrouillage; Sangle de transport; Plateau amovible; Broches/tiges pour bobines; Empilable; Base pivotante/rotative; Œillet d'alimentation pour fil/laine; Poche à fermeture éclair pour accessoires; Autre
ja: スレッド&ヤーンオーガナイザー機能: 調整可能な仕切り; キャリングハンドル; クリアな蓋/窓; 引き出し; 伸縮ループ; 外ポケット; 吊り下げフック; ラベルエリア; ロック付きラッチ; ポータブルストラップ; 取り外し可能トレイ; スプールピン/ペグ; スタッキング可能; 回転ベース; 糸/編み糸送り穴; ジッパー付きアクセサリーポケット; その他
fi: Lankojen säilytysratkaisun ominaisuudet: Säädettävät jakajat; Kantokahva; Läpinäkyvä kansi/ikkuna; Vetolaatikot; Kuminauhalenkit; Ulkotaskut; Ripustuskoukku; Merkintäalue; Lukitussalpa; Kantohihna; Irrotettava tarjotin; Rullatapit; Pinottava; Kääntyvä/pyörivä jalusta; Langan syöttöaukko; Vetoketjullinen tarviketasku; Muu
zh-TW: 線紗收納器具功能: 可調式隔板; 提把; 透明蓋/視窗; 抽屜; 彈性扣環; 外部口袋; 掛鉤; 標籤區; 鎖定扣; 便攜背帶; 可拆卸托盤; 線軸銷/釘柱; 可堆疊; 旋轉底座; 出線孔; 拉鍊配件口袋; 其他
pl: Funkcje organizera nici i przędzy: Regulowane przegrody; Uchwyt do przenoszenia; Przezroczysta pokrywa/okienko; Szuflada(-y); Elastyczne pętle; Kieszenie zewnętrzne; Haczyk do zawieszania; Miejsce na etykietę; Zatrzask blokujący; Pasek do przenoszenia; Wyjmowana taca; Kołki/trzpienie na szpule; Możliwość układania w stos; Obrotowa podstawa; Oczko do przeprowadzania nici/przędzy; Kieszeń na akcesoria zapinana na zamek; Inne
nl: Draad- en garenorganizer kenmerken: Verstelbare verdelers; Draaghandvat; Doorzichtig deksel/venster; Lade(s); Elastische lussen; Externe vakken; Ophanghaak; Labelruimte; Vergrendelbare sluiting; Draagriem; Verwijderbare lade; Spoelpennen; Stapelbaar; Draaibare voet; Draad-/garendoorvoer; Accessoirevak met rits; Overige
ru: Особенности органайзера для нитей и пряжи: Регулируемые разделители; Ручка для переноски; Прозрачная крышка/окно; Выдвижные ящики; Эластичные петли; Внешние карманы; Крючок для подвешивания; Место для маркировки; Фиксирующая защелка; Ремень для переноски; Съемный лоток; Стержни/колышки для катушек; Штабелируемый; Поворотное/вращающееся основание; Отверстие (люверс) для подачи нити/пряжи; Карман для аксессуаров на молнии; Другое
hr-HR: Značajke organizatora konca i prediva: Prilagodljive pregrade; Ručka za nošenje; Prozirni poklopac/prozor; Ladica (ladice); Elastične petlje; Vanjski džepovi; Kuka za vješanje; Područje za naljepnice; Zasun za zaključavanje; Remen za prenošenje; Odvojiva ladica; Klinovi/držači za špule; Mogućnost slaganja; Okretna/rotirajuća baza; Otvor za provlačenje konca/pređe; Džep za pribor s patentnim zatvaračem; Ostalo
da: Funktioner for tråd- og garnorganizer: Justerbare rumdelere; Bærehåndtag; Gennemsigtigt låg/vindue; Skuffe(r); Elastikstropper; Udvendige lommer; Krog til ophængning; Etiketområde; Låsemekanisme; Bærestrop; Udtagelig bakke; Spolepinde/tapper; Stabelbar; Drejelig/roterende base; Fremføringshul til tråd/garn; Tilbehørslomme med lynlås; Andet
pt-BR: Organizador de linha e fio recursos: Divisórias ajustáveis; Alça de transporte; Tampa/janela transparente; Gaveta(s); Laços elásticos; Bolsos externos; Gancho para pendurar; Área para etiquetas; Trava de fechamento; Alça portátil; Bandeja removível; Pinos para carretéis; Empilhável; Base giratória/rotatória; Anel isolante para alimentação de linha/fio; Bolso para acessórios com zíper; Outros
bg-BG: Характеристики на органайзера за конци и прежда: Регулируеми разделители; Дръжка за носене; Прозрачен капак/прозорец; Чекмедже(та); Еластични халки; Външни джобове; Кука за окачване; Място за етикет; Заключваща се ключалка; Преносима каишка; Подвижна табла; Щифтове за макари; Стифиращ се; Въртяща се основа; Отвор за подаване на конец/прежда; Джоб за аксесоари с цип; Друго
zh-CN: 线材/纱线收纳器特性: 可调节分隔板; 提手; 透明盖子/窗口; 抽屉; 弹性环; 外部口袋; 挂钩; 标签区域; 锁扣; 便携式背带; 可拆卸托盘; 线轴销/钉; 可堆叠; 旋转底座; 线/纱线进线孔垫圈; 带拉链的配件口袋; 其他
it: Caratteristiche dell'organizer per fili e filati: Divisori regolabili; Maniglia per il trasporto; Coperchio/finestra trasparente; Cassetti; Passanti elastici; Tasche esterne; Gancio per appendere; Area per etichetta; Chiusura a scatto; Cinghia portatile; Vassoio rimovibile; Perni/pioli per rocchetti; Impilabile; Base girevole/rotante; Occhiello passafilo; Tasca per accessori con cerniera; Altro
pt-PT: Características do organizador de linhas e fios: Divisórias ajustáveis; Pega de transporte; Tampa/janela transparente; Gaveta(s); Argolas elásticas; Bolsos externos; Gancho de suspensão; Área de etiqueta; Fecho com bloqueio; Fita portátil; Tabuleiro amovível; Pinos/cavilhas para bobinas; Empilhável; Base giratória; Ilhó para passagem de linha/fio; Bolso para acessórios com fecho; Outro
de: Funktionen des Garnorganizers: Verstellbare Trennwände; Tragegriff; Durchsichtiger Deckel/Sichtfenster; Schublade(n); Elastische Schlaufen; Außentaschen; Aufhängehaken; Beschriftungsbereich; Verriegelung; Tragegurt; Herausnehmbarer Einsatz; Spulenstifte/-halter; Stapelbar; Drehbare Basis; Öse für Faden-/Garnführung; Zubehörtasche mit Reißverschluss; Sonstige
cs: Funkce organizéru na nitě a příze: Nastavitelné přepážky; Rukojeť na přenášení; Průhledné víko / okénko; Zásuvky; Pružná očka; Vnější kapsy; Háček na zavěšení; Místo na štítek; Zajišťovací západka; Přenosný popruh; Vyjímatelná přihrádka; Trny / kolíčky na cívky; Stohovatelný; Otočná základna; Průchodka pro přívod niti / příze; Kapsa na příslušenství na zip; Ostatní
sk-SK: Funkcie organizéra na nite a priadzu: Nastaviteľné priehradky; Rukoväť na prenášanie; Priehľadné veko/okienko; Zásuvky; Elastické pútka; Vonkajšie vrecká; Závesný háčik; Miesto na štítok; Uzamykacia západka; Popruh na prenášanie; Odnímateľný podnos; Kolíky/háčiky na cievky; Stohovateľné; Otočná základňa; Priechodka na posun nite/priadze; Vrecko na príslušenstvo so zipsom; Iné
sv: Funktioner för tråd- och garnorganisering: Justerbara avdelare; Bärhandtag; Genomskinligt lock/fönster; Låda/lådor; Elastiska öglor; Utvändiga fickor; Upphängningskrok; Etikettområde; Låsspärr; Bärrem; Uttagbar bricka; Spolstift/pinnar; Staplingsbar; Snurrande/roterande bas; Matningshål för tråd/garn; Tillbehörsficka med dragkedja; Annat
tr: İplik ve yün düzenleyici özellikleri: Ayarlanabilir bölücüler; Taşıma sapı; Şeffaf kapak/pencere; Çekmece(ler); Elastik halkalar; Dış cepler; Asma kancası; Etiket alanı; Kilit mandalı; Taşınabilir kayış; Çıkarılabilir tepsi; Makara pimleri/mandal; Üst üste dizilebilir; Döner taban; İplik/yün besleme rondelası; Fermuarlı aksesuar cebi; Diğer